District of Columbia statutes.
22-4231

Definitions.

For the purposes of this chapter, the term:

(1)

“Criminal Justice Coordinating Council” or “CJCC” means the Criminal Justice Coordinating Council for the District of Columbia that was established by and has been operating pursuant to the Memorandum of Agreement dated May 28, 1998.

(2)

“Independent agency” shall have the meaning provided that term in § 1-603.01(13).

History

Oct. 3, 2001, D.C. Law 14-28, § 1502, 48 DCR 6981

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see §§ 22, 23 of Technical Amendments Emergency Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-108, August 3, 2001, 48 DCR 7622).
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 1402 of Fiscal Year 2002 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-124, August 3, 2001, 48 DCR 7861).